Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.764

[Art. 112] Drunk on duty—Sleeping on post—Leaving post before relief.

Any person subject to this code who is found drunk on duty or sleeping upon his or her post, or who leaves his or her post before he or she is regularly relieved, shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 2011 c 336 s 787; 1963 c 220 s 110.]